Mississippi statutes. Title 5. Legislative Department
Chapter 8. Lobbying Law Reform Act of 1994

§ 5-8-1.
Short Title.

This chapter shall be cited as the “Lobbying Law Reform Act of 1994.”

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 469, § 1; brought forward without change, Laws, 2015, ch. 431, § 9, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

§ 5-8-3.
Definitions.

The following words and phrases shall have the meanings ascribed herein unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:

(i) “Anything of value” means:

1. A pecuniary item, including money, or a bank bill or note;

2. A promissory note, bill of exchange, order, draft, warrant, check or bond given for the payment of money;

3. A contract, agreement, promise or other obligation for an advance, conveyance, forgiveness of indebtedness, deposit, distribution, loan, payment, gift, pledge or transfer of money;

4. A stock, bond, note or other investment interest in an entity;

5. A receipt given for the payment of money or other property;

6. A right in action;

7. A gift, tangible good, chattel or an interest in a gift, tangible good or chattel;

8. A loan or forgiveness of indebtedness;

9. A work of art, antique or collectible;

10. An automobile or other means of personal transportation;

11. Real property or an interest in real property, including title to realty, a fee simple or partial interest, present or future, contingent or vested within realty, a leasehold interest, or other beneficial interest in realty;

12. An honorarium or compensation for services;

13. A rebate or discount in the price of anything of value, unless the rebate or discount is made in the ordinary course of business to a member of the public without regard to that person’s status as an executive, legislative or public official or public employee, or the sale or trade of something for reasonable compensation that would ordinarily not be available to a member of the public;

14. A promise or offer of employment;

15. Any other thing of value that is pecuniary or compensatory in value to a person, except as otherwise provided in subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph; or

16. A payment that directly benefits an executive, legislative or public official or public employee or a member of that person’s immediate family.

“Anything of value” does not mean:

1. Informational material such as books, reports, pamphlets, calendars or periodicals informing an executive, legislative or public official or public employee of her or his official duties;

2. A certificate, plaque or other commemorative item which has little pecuniary value;

3. Food and beverages for immediate consumption provided by a lobbyist up to a value of Ten Dollars ($10.00) in the aggregate during any calendar year;

4. Campaign contributions reported in accordance with Section 23-15-801 et seq., Mississippi Code of 1972.

“Commission” means the Mississippi Ethics Commission, when used in the context of Section 5-8-19.

“Compensation” means:

An advance, conveyance, forgiveness of indebtedness, deposit, distribution, loan, payment, gift, pledge or transfer of money or anything of value, including reimbursement of travel, food or lodging costs; or

A contract, agreement, promise or other obligation for an advance, conveyance, forgiveness of indebtedness, deposit, distribution, loan, payment, gift, pledge or transfer of money or anything of value, including reimbursement of travel, food or lodging costs, for services rendered or to be rendered.

“Executive action” means the proposal, drafting, development, consideration, amendment, adoption, approval, promulgation, issuance, modification, rejection or postponement by a state or local governmental entity of a rule, regulation, order, decision, determination or other quasi-legislative action or proceeding.

“Executive agency” means:

An agency, board, commission, governing authority or other body in the executive branch of state or local government; or

An independent body of state or local government that is not a part of the legislative or judicial branch, but which shall include county boards of supervisors.

“Executive official” means:

A member or employee of a state agency, board, commission, governing authority or other body in the executive branch of state or local government; or

A public official or public employee, or any employee of such person, of state or local government who takes an executive action.

“Expenditure” means:

A purchase, payment, distribution, loan, forgiveness of a loan or payment of a loan by a third party, advance, deposit, transfer of funds, a promise to make a payment, or a gift of money or anything of value for any purpose;

A payment to a lobbyist for salary, fee, commission, compensation for expenses, or other purpose by a person employing, retaining or contracting for the services of the lobbyist separately or jointly with other persons;

A payment in support of or assistance to a lobbyist or the lobbyist’s activities, including the direct payment of expenses incurred at the request or suggestion of the lobbyist;

A payment that directly benefits an executive, legislative or public official or a member of the official’s immediate family;

A payment, including compensation, payment or reimbursement for the services, time or expenses of an employee for or in connection with direct communication with an executive, legislative or public official made at the direction of the employee’s employer;

A payment for or in connection with soliciting or urging other persons to enter into direct communication with an executive, legislative or public official; or

A payment or reimbursement for food, beverages, travel, lodging, entertainment or sporting activities.

“Gift” means anything of value to the extent that consideration of equal or greater value is not received, including a rebate or discount in the price of anything of value unless the rebate or discount is made in the ordinary course of business to a member of the public without regard to that person’s status as an executive, legislative or public official.

“Legislative action” means:

Preparation, research, drafting, introduction, consideration, modification, amendment, approval, passage, enactment, tabling, postponement, defeat or rejection of a bill, resolution, amendment, motion, report, nomination, appointment or other matter by the Mississippi State Legislature or a member or employee of the Legislature acting or purporting to act in an official capacity;

Action by the Governor in approving or vetoing a bill or other action of the Legislature;

Action by the Legislature in:

1. Overriding or sustaining a veto by the Governor; or

2. Considering, confirming or rejecting an executive appointment of the Governor.

“Legislative official” means:

A member, member-elect or presiding officer of the Legislature;

A member of a commission or other entity established by and responsible to either or both houses of the Legislature;

A staff member, officer or employee to a member or member-elect of the Legislature, to a member of a commission or other entity established by and responsible to either or both houses of the Legislature, or to the Legislature or any house, committee or office thereof.

“Lobbying” means:

Influencing or attempting to influence legislative or executive action through oral or written communication; or

Solicitation of others to influence legislative or executive action; or

Paying or promising to pay anything of value directly or indirectly related to legislative or executive action.

“Lobbyist” means:

An individual who is employed and receives payments, or who contracts for economic consideration, including reimbursement for reasonable travel and living expenses, for the purpose of lobbying;

An individual who represents a legislative or public official or public employee, or who represents a person, organization, association or other group, for the purpose of lobbying;

A sole proprietor, owner, part owner or shareholder in a business who has a pecuniary interest in legislative or executive action, who engages in lobbying activities; or

Any individual described in subparagraphs (i), (ii) or (iii) of this paragraph (l) who is employed by or has contracted with any agency, legislative or public official or public employee, or any other public entity for the purpose of providing any type of consulting or other similar service but also engages in any type of lobbying activities. Such individual shall not qualify for any exemption under Section 5-8-7.

“Lobbyist’s client” means the person in whose behalf the lobbyist influences or attempts to influence legislative or executive action.

“Local” means all entities of government at the county, county-district, multicounty district, municipal or school district level.

“Person” means an individual, proprietorship, firm, partnership, joint venture, joint-stock company, syndicate, business trust, estate, company, corporation, association, club, committee, organization or group of persons acting in concert.

“Public employee” means an individual appointed to a position, including a position created by statute, whether compensated or not, in state or local government and includes any employee of the public employee. The term includes a member of the board of trustees, chancellor, vice chancellor or the equivalent thereof in the state university system or the state community and junior college system, and a president of a state college or university.

“Public official” means an individual elected to a state or local office, or an individual who is appointed to fill a vacancy in the office.

“Value” means the retail cost or fair market worth of an item or items, whichever is greater.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 469, § 2; Laws, 2015, ch. 431, § 7, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

§ 5-8-5.
Registration statements; filing; contents; length of registration period; effective date of registration; termination of registration; forms.

Except as otherwise provided in Section 5-8-7 of this chapter and in addition to reports required by Sections 5-8-9 and 5-8-11 of this chapter, every lobbyist and every lobbyist’s client shall file a registration statement with the Secretary of State within five (5) calendar days after becoming a lobbyist, becoming a lobbyist’s client or beginning to lobby for a new client. The filing of every registration statement shall be accompanied by the payment of a registration fee of Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00) to the Secretary of State. The lobbyist shall file the registration statement and pay the fees to the Secretary of State for each lobbyist’s client whom the lobbyist represents.

The registration statement shall include the following:

The name, address, occupation and telephone number of the lobbyist;

The name, address, telephone number and principal place of business of the lobbyist’s client;

The kind of business of the lobbyist’s client;

The full name of the person or persons who control the lobbyist’s client, the partners, if any, and officers of the lobbyist’s client;

The full name, address and telephone number of each lobbyist employed by or representing the lobbyist’s client; and

A statement or statements by the lobbyist and lobbyist’s client indicating the specific nature of the issues being advocated for or against on behalf of the lobbyist’s client, with sufficient detail so that the precise nature of the lobbyist’s advocacy is evident from the statement itself.

Registration shall be valid for one (1) calendar year, commencing January 1 and ending December 31 of each year. If the lobbyist or lobbyist’s client shall register after January 1, the registration shall be effective upon actual receipt by the Secretary of State and shall cease on December 31 of each year.

A lobbyist or lobbyist’s client may terminate his registration by filing an expenditure report required under this chapter. Such report shall include information through the last day of lobbying activity. The termination report must indicate that the lobbyist intends to use the report as the final accounting of lobbying activity.

The Secretary of State shall prescribe and make available to every lobbyist and lobbyist’s client appropriate forms for filing registration statements as required by Sections 5-8-1 through 5-8-19 of this chapter.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 469, § 3; brought forward without change, Laws, 2015, ch. 431, § 10, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

§ 5-8-7.
Persons excluded from definition of “lobbyist” and “lobbyist’s client”.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter, except as otherwise provided in Section 5-8-3(l)(iv), the following person shall not be included within the definition of “lobbyist” or “lobbyist’s client” under this chapter, and accordingly the registration and reporting provisions, including the payment of related fees, of this chapter do not apply to:

A legislative or public official acting in an official capacity.

An individual who:

Represents or purports to represent only the individual;

Receives no compensation or anything of value for lobbying; and

Has no pecuniary interest in the legislative or executive action.

An individual lobbying in his or her own interest, his or her own business interest, who pays, or promises to pay, offers to pay or causes to be paid to public officials, legislative officials or public employees any thing or things of value aggregating in value to less than Two Hundred Dollars ($200.00) in any calendar year.

An individual lobbying on behalf of his or her employer’s business interest where such lobbying is not a primary or regular function of his employment position if such individual pays, promises to pay, offers to pay, or causes to be paid individually or on the employer’s behalf to public officials, legislative officials, or public employees any thing or things of value aggregating in value to less than Two Hundred Dollars ($200.00) in any calendar year.

An individual lobbying on behalf of an association of which he or she is a member, where such lobbying is not a primary or regular function of his or her position in the association, if such individual pays, promises to pay, offers to pay, or causes to be paid individually or on the association’s behalf to public officials, legislative officials or public employees any thing or things of value aggregating in value to less than Two Hundred Dollars ($200.00) in any calendar year.

An individual who is a shareholder, owner or part owner of a business who lobbies on behalf of such business, where such individual is not an employee of the business, if such individual pays, promises to pay, offers to pay, or causes to be paid individually or on behalf of the business to public officials, legislative officials or public employees any thing or things of value aggregating in value to less than Two Hundred Dollars ($200.00) in any calendar year.

An individual who:

Limits lobbying solely to formal testimony before a public meeting of a legislative body or an executive agency, or a committee, division or department thereof; and

Registers the appearance in the records of the public body, if such records are kept.

An individual who is a licensed attorney representing a client by:

Drafting bills, preparing arguments thereon, and advising the client or rendering opinions as to the construction and effect of proposed or pending legislation, where such services are usual and customary professional legal services which are not otherwise connected with legislative action; or

Providing information, on behalf of the client, to an executive or public official, a public employee, or an agency, board, commission, governing authority or other body of state or local government where such services are usual and customary professional legal services including or related to a particular nonlegislative matter, case or controversy.

News media and employees of the news media whose activity is limited solely to the publication or broadcast of news, editorial comments, or paid advertisements that attempt to influence legislative or executive action. For the purposes of this section, “news media” shall be construed to be bona fide radio and television stations, newspapers, journals or magazines, or bona fide news bureaus or associations which in turn furnish information solely to bona fide radio or television stations, newspapers, journals or magazines.

An individual who engages in lobbying activities exclusively on behalf of a religious organization which qualifies as a tax-exempt organization under the Internal Revenue Code.

An individual who is a nonattorney professional and who receives professional fees and expenses to represent clients on executive agency matters, except that if anything of value shall be paid or promised to be paid directly or indirectly on behalf of a client for the personal use or benefit of an executive or public official or public employee, then expenditures and actions of the individual are reportable under this chapter, and the individual must register as a lobbyist.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 469, § 4; Laws, 2015, ch. 431, § 8, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

§ 5-8-9.
Report of expenditures of lobbyist’s client; exceptions.

Except as otherwise provided in Section 5-8-7 of this chapter and in subsection (7) of this section, no later than January 30 of each year, a lobbyist’s client shall file a report of expenditures with the Secretary of State. The report must contain information on all expenditures paid by the lobbyist’s client during the preceding twelve (12) calendar months.

The report must list expenditures for the purpose of lobbying according to the following categories:

A payment to a lobbyist for salary, fee, compensation for expenses, or other purpose by a person employing, retaining or contracting for the services of the lobbyist separately or jointly with other persons;

A payment for those portions of office rent, utilities, supplies and compensation of support personnel attributable to lobbying activities;

A payment in support of or assistance to a lobbyist or the lobbyist’s activities, including the direct payment of expenses incurred at the request or suggestion of the lobbyist;

A payment, including compensation, payment or reimbursement for the services, time or expenses of an employee for or in connection with direct communication with an executive, legislative or public official or public employee, where such communication is made at the request, suggestion or direction of the lobbyist’s client;

A payment for or in connection with soliciting or urging other persons to enter into direct communication with an executive, legislative or public official or public employee, where such communication is made at the request, suggestion or direction of the lobbyist’s client;

A payment or reimbursement for food, beverages, travel, lodging, entertainment or sporting activities; or

A purchase, payment, distribution, loan, forgiveness of a loan or payment of a loan by a third party, advance, deposit, transfer of funds, a promise to make a payment, or a gift of money or anything of value for any purpose.

For each executive, legislative or public official or public employee who was paid, given or promised to be paid anything of value in full or in part from the lobbyist’s client, the report must also include:

The name of the executive, legislative or public official or public employee who was paid, given or promised anything of value;

A description and the monetary value of anything of value paid, given or promised to such official or employee, with sufficient detail so that the nature of the transfer is clear;

The place and date anything of value was paid, given or promised; and

The name of the person who paid, gave or promised to pay anything of value.

Each expenditure for the purpose of lobbying must be reported in accordance with the category of the expenditure required in this section and with any additional categories as may be required by rule or regulation of the Secretary of State.

The report due January 30 shall include a cumulative total for the calendar year for all reportable categories.

A lobbyist’s client shall maintain contemporaneous records of all expenditures reportable under Sections 5-8-1 through 5-8-19 of this chapter and shall retain such records for a period of two (2) years.

If the State of Mississippi is a lobbyist’s client, the State of Mississippi shall be exempt from filing an annual report.

If the entire Legislature and all statewide elected officials are individually invited to a single function, which is sponsored by a lobbyist’s client, or a lobbyist on behalf of such client, and is to begin and end within one (1) day, then it shall not be necessary to report the costs related to food and beverages offered for immediate consumption required in subsection (3) of this section, so long as food and beverages provided at such functions are offered equally to all invitees; however, in all such cases, the amount expended for such functions shall be reported in accordance with the provisions of this subsection.

The report of the expenditure connected with a single function as described in paragraph (a) of this subsection shall be made by the lobbyist’s client and shall include the following:

The total amount of money expended for the function;

The estimated total number of persons in attendance at the function;

The estimated total number of public officials in attendance at the function.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 469, § 5; brought forward without change, Laws, 2015, ch. 431, § 11, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

§ 5-8-11.
Report of payments received by lobbyist from each lobbyist’s client; exceptions.

Except as otherwise provided in Section 5-8-7 of this chapter, a lobbyist shall file with the Secretary of State a separate report for each lobbyist’s client. The report shall specifically list all payments received from the lobbyist’s client and all expenditures that were initiated or paid by the lobbyist on behalf of each lobbyist’s client during each reporting period required herein.

The report must list expenditures for the purpose of lobbying according to the following categories:

A payment to the lobbyist for salary, fee, compensation for expenses, or other purpose by the person employing, retaining or contracting for the services of the lobbyist separately or jointly with other persons;

A payment for those portions of office rent, utilities, supplies and compensation of support personnel attributable to lobbying activities;

A payment in support of or assistance to a lobbyist or the lobbyist’s activities, including the direct payment of expenses incurred at the request or suggestion of the lobbyist;

A payment, including compensation, payment or reimbursement for the services, time or expenses of an employee for or in connection with direct communication with an executive, legislative or public official or public employee, where such communication is made at the request, suggestion or direction of the lobbyist;

A payment for or in connection with soliciting or urging other persons to enter into direct communication with an executive, legislative or public official or public employee, where such communication is made at the request, suggestion or direction of the lobbyist;

A payment or reimbursement for food, beverages, travel, lodging, entertainment or sporting activities;

A purchase, payment, distribution, loan, or forgiveness of a loan or payment of a loan by a third party, advance, deposit, transfer of funds, a promise to make a payment, or a gift of money or anything of value for any purpose.

For each executive, legislative or public official or public employee who was paid, given or promised to be paid anything of value in full or in part from the lobbyist, the report must also include:

The name of the executive, legislative or public official or employee who was paid, given or promised anything of value;

A description and the monetary value of anything of value paid, given or promised to such official or employee, with sufficient detail so that the nature of the transfer is clear;

The place and date anything of value was paid, given or promised; and

The name of the person who paid, gave or promised to pay anything of value.

Each expenditure for the purpose of lobbying must be reported in accordance with the category of the expenditure required in this section and with any additional categories as may be required by rule or regulation of the Secretary of State.

A report of expenditures must be filed with the Secretary of State no later than January 30 of each year. The report shall contain information on all expenditures paid or initiated by the lobbyist on behalf of each lobbyist’s client during the preceding twelve (12) calendar months, and it shall include a cumulative total for the calendar year of all reportable categories.

In addition to the annual report required above, a lobbyist shall file two (2) reports during regular sessions of the Legislature with the Secretary of State on February 25 and within ten (10) days after the Legislature’s adjournment sine die. Such additional report shall include the name of the executive, legislative, or public official or public employee who receives anything of value from the lobbyist or from the lobbyist on behalf of the lobbyist’s client, the name of the person receiving the payment, the name of the person making the payment, the amount of the payment and the date of the payment. However, any lobbyist who lobbies local government exclusively shall be exempt from the requirement of filing the reports required by this paragraph.

If the entire Legislature and all statewide elected officials are individually invited to a single function which is sponsored by a lobbyist on behalf of one or more lobbyist’s clients and is to begin and end within one (1) day, then it shall not be necessary to report the costs related to food and beverages offered for immediate consumption as required in subsection (3) of this section, so long as food and beverages provided at such functions are offered equally to all invitees; however, in all such cases, the amount expended for such functions shall be reported in accordance with the provisions of this subsection.

The report of the expenditure connected with a single function as described in paragraph (a) of this subsection shall be made by the lobbyist and shall include the following:

The total amount of money expended for the function, reception or meal;

The total number of persons in attendance at the function, reception or meal;

The total number of legislators in attendance at the function, reception or meal.

A lobbyist shall maintain contemporaneous records of all expenditures reportable under Sections 5-8-1 through 5-8-19 of this chapter, and shall retain such records for a period of two (2) years.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 469, § 6; brought forward without change, Laws, 2015, ch. 431, § 12, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

§ 5-8-13.
Prohibited acts; required acts.

A lobbyist shall not contract to receive or accept compensation dependent upon the success or failure of a legislative or executive action.

A lobbyist or lobbyist’s client shall not knowingly or willfully make or cause to be made a false statement or misrepresentation of facts to an executive, legislative or public official or public employee, or to the public in general with the intent to affect the outcome of a legislative or executive action.

A lobbyist or lobbyist’s client shall not cause a legislative or executive action for the purpose of obtaining employment to lobby in support of or in opposition to the legislative or executive action.

An executive, legislative or public official or public employee shall not be a lobbyist, except that he may act as a lobbyist when acting in his official capacity.

A lobbyist must disclose anything of value given in whole or in part to any executive, legislative or public official or public employee.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 469, § 7; brought forward without change, Laws, 2015, ch. 431, § 13, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

§ 5-8-15.
Investigations of violations of chapter.

The district attorney of the circuit court of the district wherein an alleged violation occurred shall investigate violations of this chapter.

In addition to a district attorney’s authority as set forth in subsection (1) of this section, the Attorney General shall investigate alleged violations of this chapter and use all existing powers granted that office in conducting such investigations.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 469, § 8; brought forward without change, Laws, 2015, ch. 431, § 14, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

§ 5-8-17.
Penalties; Ethics Commission hearings; appeals; investigation by Attorney General of continued non-compliance.

In addition to any other penalty permitted by law, the Secretary of State shall require any person who fails to file a report as required under Sections 5-8-1 through 5-8-19 of this chapter, or who shall file a report which fails to comply with the material particulars of Sections 5-8-1 through 5-8-19 of this chapter or any rules, regulations or procedures implemented pursuant to Sections 5-8-1 through 5-8-19 of this chapter, to be assessed a civil penalty as follows:

Within five (5) calendar days after any deadline for filing a report pursuant to Sections 5-8-1 through 5-8-19 of this chapter, the Secretary of State shall compile a list of those lobbyists and lobbyists’ clients who have failed to file a required report. The Secretary of State shall provide each lobbyist or lobbyist’s client who has failed to file such a report notice of such failure by certified mail.

Beginning with the tenth calendar day after which any report shall be due, the Secretary of State shall assess the delinquent lobbyist and delinquent lobbyist’s client a civil penalty of Fifty Dollars ($50.00) per day and part of any day until a valid report is delivered to the Secretary of State, up to a maximum of ten (10) days. However, in the discretion of the Secretary of State, the assessing of such fine may be waived if the Secretary of State shall determine that unforeseeable mitigating circumstances, such as the health of the lobbyist, shall interfere with timely filing of a required report.

Filing of the required report and payment of the fine within ten (10) calendar days of notice by the Secretary of State that a required statement has not been filed constitutes compliance with Sections 5-8-1 through 5-8-19 of this chapter.

Payment of the fine without filing the required report does not in any way excuse or exempt any person required to file from the filing requirements of Sections 5-8-1 through 5-8-19 of this chapter.

Upon the sworn application of a lobbyist or lobbyist’s client against whom a civil penalty has been assessed pursuant to subsection (1), the Secretary of State shall forward the application to the Mississippi Ethics Commission. The commission shall fix a time and place for a hearing and shall cause a written notice specifying the civil penalties that have been assessed against the lobbyist or lobbyist’s client and notice of the time and place of the hearing to be served upon the lobbyist or lobbyist’s client at least twenty (20) calendar days prior to the hearing date. Such notice may be served by mailing a copy thereof by certified mail, postage prepaid, to the last known business address of the lobbyist or lobbyist’s client.

The commission is authorized to issue subpoenas for the attendance of witnesses and the production of books and papers at such hearing. Process issued by the commission shall extend to all parts of the state and shall be served by any person designated by the commission for such service.

The lobbyist or lobbyist’s client shall have the right to appear either personally or by counsel, or both, to produce witnesses or evidence in his behalf, to cross-examine witnesses and to have subpoenas issued by the commission.

A hearing officer shall be appointed by the commission to conduct the hearing. At the hearing, the hearing officer shall administer oaths as may be necessary for the proper conduct of the hearing. All hearings shall be conducted by the commission, who shall not be bound by strict rules of procedure or by the laws of evidence in the conduct of the proceedings, but the determination shall be based upon sufficient evidence to sustain it.

Where, in any proceeding before the commission, any witness fails or refuses to attend upon a subpoena issued by the commission, refuses to testify, or refuses to produce any books and papers the production of which is called for by a subpoena, the attendance of such witness, the giving of his testimony or the production of the books and papers shall be enforced by any court of competent jurisdiction of this state in the manner provided for the enforcement of attendance and testimony of witnesses in civil cases in the courts of this state.

Within fifteen (15) calendar days after conclusion of the hearing, the commission shall reduce its decision to writing and forward an attested true copy thereof to the last known business address of the lobbyist or lobbyist’s client by way of United States first-class, certified mail, postage prepaid.

The right to appeal from the decision of the commission in an administrative hearing concerning the assessment of civil penalties authorized pursuant to this section is hereby granted. Such appeal shall be to the Circuit Court of Hinds County and shall include a verbatim transcript of the testimony at the hearing. The appeal shall be taken within thirty (30) calendar days after notice of the decision of the commission following an administrative hearing. The appeal shall be perfected upon filing notice of the appeal and by the prepayment of all costs, including the cost of the preparation of the record of the proceedings by the commission, and the filing of a bond in the sum of Two Hundred Dollars ($200.00), conditioned that if the decision of the commission be affirmed by the court, the lobbyist or lobbyist’s client will pay the costs of the appeal and the action in court. If the decision is reversed by the court, the Secretary of State will pay the costs of the appeal and the action in court.

If there is an appeal, such appeal shall act as a supersedeas. The court shall dispose of the appeal and enter its decision promptly. The hearing on the appeal may be tried in vacation, in the court’s discretion. The scope of review of the court shall be limited to a review of the record made before the commission to determine if the action of the commission is unlawful for the reason that it was (i) not supported by substantial evidence, (ii) arbitrary or capricious, (iii) beyond the power of the commission to make, or (iv) in violation of some statutory or constitutional right of the appellant. The decision of the court may be appealed to the Supreme Court in the manner provided by law.

If, after forty-five (45) calendar days of the date of the administrative hearing procedure set forth in subsection (2), the lobbyist or lobbyist’s client shall not file a valid report as required by law, the commission shall notify the Attorney General of the delinquency. The Attorney General shall investigate said offense in accordance with the provisions of this chapter.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 469, § 9; brought forward without change, Laws, 2015, ch. 431, § 15, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

§ 5-8-19.
Duties of Secretary of State.

The Secretary of State shall:

Provide forms for registration and for statements required by Sections 5-8-1 through 5-8-19 of this chapter to all persons required to file.

Issue a certificate of registration to a lobbyist registered under the provisions of Sections 5-8-1 through 5-8-19 of this chapter.

Make all statements and reports filed available for public inspection and copying, at a reasonable cost, during regular office hours.

Publish an annual report summarizing the financial activities of lobbyists and lobbyists’ clients, and such annual report shall not include amounts reported pursuant to Sections 5-8-9(8) and 5-8-11(7) for single functions in the calculation of the cumulative total amount of money expended for lobbying purposes.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 469, § 10; brought forward without change, Laws, 2015, ch. 431, § 16, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

§ 5-8-21.
Penalties for intentional violations; prosecution of corporation or association not barred.

Any person who, with intent, violates any of the provisions of this chapter whether acting either individually or as an officer, agent, employee, or counsel of a person, firm, corporation or association, or any person whether acting individually or as the officer, employee, agent or counsel of a firm, corporation or association, who, with intent, causes or participates, either directly or indirectly, in any violation of the provisions of this chapter shall upon conviction for the first offense be fined not more than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) or imprisoned in the county jail not more than six (6) months or both and upon conviction for a second or any subsequent offense be fined not more than Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) or imprisoned in the Penitentiary not more than three (3) years or both. Any association or corporation which, with intent, violates, or causes or participates, either directly or indirectly, in any violation of any of the provisions of this chapter shall, for each offense, upon conviction, be fined not more than Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00). The prosecution or conviction of one or more of the officers or employees of such corporation or association shall not be a bar to the prosecution and conviction of the corporation or association for such offense.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 469, § 11; brought forward without change, Laws, 2015, ch. 431, § 17, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

§ 5-8-23.
Severability clause.

If any section, paragraph, sentence, clause, phrase or any part of this chapter passed hereafter is declared to be unconstitutional or void, or if for any reason is declared to be invalid or of no effect, the remaining sections, paragraphs, sentences, clauses, phrases or parts thereof shall be in no manner affected thereby but shall remain in full force and effect.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 469, § 13; brought forward without change, Laws, 2015, ch. 431, § 18, eff from and after July 1, 2015.